Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-357
Veterans; members of the armed forces; migratory waterfowl hunting season; requirements.

(1) For purposes of this section:

(a) Member of the armed forces means any member of the armed forces on active duty, including any member of the National Guard or reserves on active duty other than active duty for training; and

(b) Veteran has the same meaning as in 38 U.S.C. 101, as such section existed on January 1, 2024.

(2) The commission shall prescribe a migratory waterfowl hunting season for veterans and members of the armed forces.

(3) Any veteran or member of the armed forces may hunt during such season as long as such veteran or member of the armed forces has a valid hunting permit issued under the Game Law and all required stamps necessary to hunt migratory waterfowl in Nebraska.

(4) No motor vehicle entry permit or fee shall be required for entry into a permit area as defined in section 37-435 by such veteran or member of the armed forces during such season.

(5) Nothing in this section shall affect the applicability of statutes, rules, regulations, and orders other than the permit and stamp requirements described in this section.

(6) The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations and pass and publish orders to carry out this section.

Laws 2024, LB867, § 3.